Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0056.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11cc. In addition to the appropriations in section 11, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, there is appropriated $100.00 from the state school aid fund for the public schools of this state and for certain other state purposes related to education. Sec. 201i. For fiscal year 2023-2024 only, there is appropriated $3,300,000.00 from the coronavirus state fiscal recovery funds under the American rescue plan act of 2021, title IX, subtitle M of Public Law 117-2, to the Michigan Community College Association, for the community college academic catch-up program. Funds appropriated under this section must be used in accordance with the requirements described for the community college academic catch-up program established under former section 216a. Sec. 236s. In addition to the appropriations in section 236, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, there is appropriated $100.00 from the state general fund/general purpose money for purposes related to higher education. Enacting section 1. (1) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending on school aid under article I of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772, as amended by 2024 PA 120, 2024 PA 148, and this amendatory act from state sources for fiscal year 2024-2025 is estimated at $18,497,482,000.00 and state appropriations for school aid to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2024-2025 are estimated at Â $17,054,444,000.00. (2) In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources for higher education for fiscal year 2024-2025 under article III of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1836 to 388.1891, as amended by 2024 PA 120 and this amendatory act is estimated at $2,321,092,700.00 and the amount of that state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2024-2025 is estimated at $70,000.00.